Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-3206
Award; conditions.

An award may be granted to an eligible student for attendance at an eligible postsecondary educational institution if:

(1) The eligible student is accepted for enrollment as follows:

(a) In the case of an eligible student beginning the first year in attendance at an eligible postsecondary educational institution, such eligible student has satisfied requirements for admission and has enrolled or indicated an intent to enroll in an eligible postsecondary educational institution; or

(b) In the case of an eligible student enrolled in an eligible postsecondary educational institution following the successful completion of the student's first year in attendance, such eligible student continues to meet the requirements of the Door to College Scholarship Act and has maintained the minimum standards of performance as required by the eligible postsecondary educational institution in which the eligible student is enrolled;

(2) The eligible student receiving such award certifies that the award will be used only for educational expenses; and

(3) The eligible student has complied with the act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 33.
July 1, 2023